Nevada, session 83, SB139.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
1 Section 1. NRS 200.220 is hereby repealed.
2 Sec. 2. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
3 1. In Lapinski v. State, 84 Nev. 611, 613 (1968), the Nevada
4 Supreme Court held that “the power to define crimes and penalties
5 lies exclusively in the legislature.”
-
*SB139*

– 2 –
1 2. The Nevada Supreme Court has further held in Tellis v.
2 State, 84 Nev. 587, 591 (1968), Sparkman v. State, 95 Nev. 76, 82
3 (1979) and State v. Dist. Ct. (Pullin), 124 Nev. 564, 567-68 (2008),
4 that the penalty for a crime is determined by the law in effect at the
5 time the offender committed the crime and not the law in effect at
6 the time the offender is sentenced unless the Legislature has
7 expressed its clear intent that a statute ameliorating the penalty
8 apply retroactively.
9 3. For those reasons, the Legislature is exercising its exclusive
10 power to define the acts which subject a person to criminal penalties
11 by retroactively applying the repeal of NRS 200.220 to apply to
12 conduct that occurred before, on or after that offense was repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
200.220 Taking drugs to terminate pregnancy; penalty. A
woman who takes or uses, or submits to the use of, any drug,
medicine or substance, or any instrument or other means, with the
intent to terminate her pregnancy after the 24th week of pregnancy,
unless the same is performed upon herself upon the advice of a
physician acting pursuant to the provisions of NRS 442.250, and
thereby causes the death of the child of the pregnancy, commits
manslaughter and shall be punished for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 10 years, and
may be further punished by a fine of not more than $10,000.
H
-
*SB139*